New York, session 2025-2026, S5097.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 592 of the banking law, as amended 2 by chapter 472 of the laws of 2008, is amended to read as follows: 3 2. The superintendent may refuse to issue a license pursuant to this 4 article if [he or she] they shall find that the applicant, or any person 5 who is a director, officer, partner, agent, employee, substantial stock- 6 holder of the applicant, consultant or person having a relationship with 7 the applicant similar to a consultant, (a) has been convicted of a crime 8 involving an activity which is a felony under this chapter or under 9 article one hundred fifty-five, one hundred seventy, one hundred seven- 10 ty-five, one hundred seventy-six, one hundred eighty, one hundred eight- 11 y-five, one hundred eighty-seven, one hundred ninety, two hundred, two 12 hundred ten or four hundred seventy, or subdivision four of section 13 160.10 of the penal law or any comparable felony under the laws of any 14 other state or the United States, provided that such crime would be a 15 felony if committed and prosecuted under the laws of this state or (b) 16 has had a license or registration revoked by the superintendent or (c) 17 has been a director, partner, or substantial stockholder of an entity 18 which has had a license or registration revoked by the superintendent or 19 (d) has been an agent, employee or officer of an entity, or a consultant 20 to, or person having had a similar relationship with, any entity which 21 has had a license or registration revoked by the superintendent where 22 such person shall have been found by the superintendent to bear respon- 23 sibility in connection with the revocation. The term "substantial stock- 24 holder", as used in this subdivision, shall be deemed to refer to a EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08533-01-5 S. 5097 2 1 person owning or controlling directly or indirectly ten per centum or 2 more of the total outstanding stock of a corporation. 3 § 2. Subdivision 2 of section 592-a of the banking law, as amended by 4 chapter 472 of the laws of 2008, is amended to read as follows: 5 2. The superintendent may refuse to issue a certificate pursuant to 6 this article if [he or she] they shall find that the applicant, or any 7 person who is a director, officer, partner, agent, employee, substantial 8 stockholder of the applicant, consultant or person having a relationship 9 with the applicant similar to a consultant, (a) has been convicted of a 10 crime involving an activity which is a felony under this chapter or 11 under article one hundred fifty-five, one hundred seventy, one hundred 12 seventy-five, one hundred seventy-six, one hundred eighty, one hundred 13 eighty-five, one hundred eighty-seven, one hundred ninety, two hundred, 14 two hundred ten or four hundred seventy, or subdivision four of section 15 160.10 of the penal law or any comparable felony under the laws of any 16 other state or the United States, provided that such crime would be a 17 felony if committed and prosecuted under the laws of this state or (b) 18 has had a license or registration revoked by the superintendent or (c) 19 has been a director, partner, or substantial stockholder of an entity 20 which has had a license or registration revoked by the superintendent or 21 (d) has been an agent, employee or officer of an entity, or a consultant 22 to, or person having had a similar relationship with, any entity which 23 has had a license or registration revoked by the superintendent where 24 such person shall have been found by the superintendent to bear respon- 25 sibility in connection with the revocation. The term "substantial stock- 26 holder", as used in this subdivision, shall be deemed to refer to a 27 person owning or controlling directly or indirectly ten per centum or 28 more of the total outstanding stock of a corporation. 29 § 3. Subdivision 3 of section 160.10 of the penal law, as added by 30 chapter 308 of the laws of 1995, is amended and a new subdivision 4 is 31 added to read as follows: 32 3. The property consists of a motor vehicle, as defined in section one 33 hundred twenty-five of the vehicle and traffic law[.]; or 34 4. The property is stolen from a bank, trust company, savings bank, 35 safe deposit company, savings and loan association or credit union, as 36 such terms are defined in section two of the banking law, or from a 37 foreign banking corporation licensed pursuant to article two of the 38 banking law, or from a bank, trust company, savings bank, savings and 39 loan association, credit union or foreign banking corporation which is 40 incorporated, chartered, organized or licensed under the laws of any 41 other state or the United States and which maintains branch offices in 42 this state. 43 § 4. This act shall take effect on the first of November next succeed- 44 ing the date on which it shall have become a law.